Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-718
Transmission, telephone, or telegraph lines; commission may vacate side of highway, when.

If a transmission, telephone, or telegraph carrier proposes to construct a line under the provisions of sections 75-709 to 75-724 on a highway both sides of which are occupied by telephone and telegraph lines or transmission lines, the commission shall order one side of the highway vacated, shall designate the side to be vacated, and shall assess the expense thereof to the parties interested in such proportions as in its judgment would best protect the rights of all parties interested and those of the general public.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 18, p. 1426;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 129.